North Dakota, session 69, SB2063.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 24-02-20 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
24-02-20. Bids, where opened - Requirements - Bonds or checks of three lowest bidders
retained.
1. All bids must be opened at the time and place specified in the advertised request for bids. The
submission of bids and bid openings may be delayed up to twenty-one days at the discretion
of the department. The submission of bids and new bid opening dates must be noticed by
electronic means as prescribed by the department. Each bid must be accompanied by a
certified or cashier's check of the bidder on a solvent bank, in an amount equal to five percent
of the bidder's bid, to be forfeited to the state highway fund should the bidder fail to effect a
contract within ten days after notice of an award or by a bidder's bond in a sum equal to ten
percent of the full amount of the bid, executed by the bidder as principal and by a surety
company authorized to do business in this state, conditioned that if the principal's bid be
accepted and the contract awarded to the principal, the principal, within ten days after notice
of award, will execute and effect a contract in accordance with the terms of the principal's bid
and a contractor's bond as required by law and the regulations and determinations of the
department.
2. All bonds or checks, except those of the responsible bidders submitting the three lowest and
best bids, must be returned to the bidders promptly upon opening such bids. The bond or
check of the responsible bidder submitting the lowest and best bid may be cashed or retained
until the contract has been awarded and executed properly. The bonds or checks of the
responsible bidders submitting the second and third lowest and best bids may be returned to
the bidders when the department has determined to whom the contract is to be awarded.

S. B. NO. 2063 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2063.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 0 Absent 11
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State